Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.490

Limitations on use of publicity fund.

All expenditures shall be made under direction of the board of publicity. No part of the publicity fund shall ever be paid to any newspaper, magazine, or periodical published within the city or county in which the city is situated, for advertising, or write-ups or for any other service or purpose and no part of the fund shall be expended for the purpose of making exhibits at any fair, exposition or the like.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.23.490. Prior: 1913 c 57 s 2, part; RRS s 9036, part.]